Utah statutes.
62A-5-313.   Transfer -- Procedures.

(1)  The director of the division, or the director's designee, may place an involuntarily committed resident in appropriate care or treatment outside the mental retardation facility.  During that placement, the order of commitment shall remain in effect, until the resident is discharged or the order is terminated.

(2)  If the resident, or the resident's parent or guardian, objects to a proposed placement under this section, the resident may appeal the decision to the executive director or the executive director's designee. Those appeals shall be conducted in accordance with the procedures and requirements of Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures Act.  If an objection is made, the proposed placement may not take effect until the committee holds that hearing and the executive director makes a final decision on the placement.

